California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(c) Appliances shall be used so that rocks or other mineral matter, aquatic plants, fish, or other aquatic life not listed in subdivision (b) of Section 8597 are not removed from the bottom or otherwise disturbed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 742, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8598.3.

(a) The fee for a marine aquaria collector’s permit shall be three hundred thirty dollars ($330).

(b) A person engaged in taking, possessing, or landing marine species under a marine aquaria collector’s permit shall not take, possess aboard a boat, or land any species under the authority of a scientific collector’s permit issued pursuant to Section 1002, 5515, or 10660 on the same fishing trip.

(c) The commission shall adjust the amount of the fees specified in subdivision (a) as necessary, to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department
 and the commission relating to those licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 559, Sec. 24.   (AB 2402)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

8598.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the director may close any portion of the fishery established under this article or any area in which this fishery is conducted, if, upon written finding, the director determines the action is necessary to protect any organisms listed in subdivision (a) of Section 8597 or the environment in which those organisms are located. The director shall reopen a fishery or any fishing areas previously closed pursuant to this section if the director determines that the conditions which necessitated the closure no longer exist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 742, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8598.6.

Notwithstanding Section 12000, a violation of this article or any regulation adopted thereunder is punishable by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 742, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 20. White Sharks and Basking Sharks [8599. - 8599.4.]

8599.

(a) It is unlawful to take any white shark (Carcharodon carcharias) for commercial purposes, except under permits issued pursuant to Section 1002 for scientific or educational purposes or pursuant to subdivision (b) for scientific or live display purposes.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), white sharks may be taken incidentally by commercial fishing operations using set gill nets, drift gill nets, or roundhaul nets. White shark taken pursuant to this subdivision shall not have the pelvic fin severed from the carcass until after the white shark is brought ashore. White shark taken pursuant to this subdivision, if landed alive, may be sold for scientific or live display purposes. 

(c) Any white shark killed or injured by any person in self-defense may not be landed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1174, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8599.3.

The department shall cooperate, to the extent that it determines feasible, with appropriate scientific institutions to facilitate data collection on white sharks taken incidentally by commercial fishing operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1174, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8599.4.

The commission may adopt regulations to manage basking sharks. A basking shark may not be taken commercially unless the commission adopts regulations for that activity and the taking is in accordance with those regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 483, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Nets [8601. - 8890.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [8601. - 8609.]

8601.

Any net or line used to take fish that is anchored to the bottom on each end and is not free to drift with the tide or current is a set net or set line. Any net so placed that it will catch or impound fish within a bight, bay, or estuary, or against the shore upon the receding of the tide is a set net. Fyke nets, shrimp nets, or crab nets are not set nets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 655, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8601.5.

(a) Set nets and set lines shall be marked at both ends with buoys displaying above their waterlines, in numerals at least 2 inches high, the fisherman’s identification number.

(b) Each piece or panel of a set net shall be marked along the corkline of the net, in a manner determined by the department to adequately identify the net, with the fisherman’s identification number. The distance between the markings shall not exceed 45 fathoms. If the lost or abandoned net is recovered by the department or persons designated by the department, the commission may require the owner of the lost or abandoned net to pay for all recovery costs. The commission may revoke the owner’s set net permit issued pursuant to Section 8681 for failure to comply with this subdivision.

(c) If a person is unable to recover a set net or portion of a set net, the person shall contact one of the department offices located in the City of Belmont, Monterey, Los Alamitos, or San Diego, not later than 72 hours after returning to port following the loss and shall report all of the following information:

(1) The date and time when the set net was lost.

(2) The location, including depth, where the net was lost.

(3) A description of the lost net, including the mesh size, length, height, and target species, and whether anchors remain attached to the net.

(4) The name and fisherman’s identification number of the person owning the net.

(5) The name and fisherman’s identification number of the person fishing with the net, if different from paragraph (4).

(6) The name and California Fish and Game number of the vessel from which the lost net was being fished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 753, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8601.6.

(a) The footrope (leadline) of any set net shall have a breaking strength of at least 50 pounds less than the combined breaking strength of the headrope and corkline.

(b) This section shall become operative on August 15, 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 655, Sec. 3.   Section operative August 15, 1990, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8602.

The length of the meshes of any net shall be determined by taking at least four meshes and measuring them inside the knots or, in the case of knotless nets, inside the points at which the meshes are joined while they are simultaneously drawn closely together.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

8603.

It is unlawful to use or operate or assist in using or operating any net, trap, line, spear, or appliance, other than in connection with angling, in taking fish, except as authorized by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 162.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8604.

It is unlawful willfully to disturb or injure any net, trap, or other apparatus to take fish which is being legally used in the waters of this state.

This section does not apply to employees of the department while they are engaged in the performance of their official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8605.

The department or any person authorized by it may use any net or other appliance in any district for the purpose of recovering fish from overflowed areas or landlocked sloughs or ponds where they have been left isolated by receding streams or floodwaters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8607.

It is unlawful for any person possessing or operating any type of net, trap, or line that is subject to federal groundfish regulations adopted pursuant to the Magnuson Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 U.S.C., Sec. 1801 et seq.) to possess or land any load of fish in violation of those federal groundfish regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1048, Sec. 7.   Effective September 26, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

8608.

Notwithstanding Sections 8660, 8665, 8724, and 8780, the commission may, after a public hearing, when it determines that it is in the best interests of the state’s marine resources and fisheries, adopt regulations, authorizing the use of nets not less than 75 feet from any private pier, wharf, jetty, breakwater, or dock, and restricting the use of the nets within 750 feet of any public pier. However, nothing in this section authorizes the commission to adopt regulations which would extend beyond the maximum of 750 feet the area in which the use of nets is prohibited, as specified in Sections 8660, 8665, 8724, and 8780, or which would prohibit the use of any nets within 75 feet of any private pier, wharf, jetty, breakwater, or dock if that use of the net is permitted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 431, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8609.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) The central California nearshore gill and trammel net fisheries for California halibut (Paralichthys californicus) and white croaker (Genyonemus lineatus) and the use of gill nets in these fisheries are expanding at a rapid rate.

(b) The incidental take of certain species of seabirds and marine mammals in set gill and trammel nets could be increasing to a level which may be adversely impacting the viability of the populations of nontarget species.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 564, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.4. Marine Resources Protection Act of 1990 [8610.1. - 8610.16.]

8610.1.

The Marine Resources Protection Act of 1990 (Art. XB, Cal. Const.) was adopted as an initiative constitutional amendment at the November 6, 1990, general election. This article codifies and implements that initiative constitutional amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.2.

(a) “District” for the purposes of this article and of Article XB of the California Constitution means a fish and game district as defined in this code on January 1, 1990.

(b) Except as specifically provided in this article, all references to sections, articles, chapters, parts, and divisions of this code are to those statutes in effect on January 1, 1990.

(c) “Ocean waters” means the
 waters of the Pacific Ocean regulated by the state.

(d) “Zone” means the Marine Resources Protection Zone established pursuant to this article. The zone consists of the following:

(1) In waters less than 70 fathoms or within one mile, whichever is less, around the Channel Islands consisting of the Islands of San Miguel, Santa Rosa, Santa Cruz, Anacapa, San Nicolaus, Santa Barbara, Santa Catalina, and San Clemente.

(2) The area within three nautical miles offshore of the mainland coast, and the area within three nautical miles off any manmade breakwater, between a line extending due west from Point Arguello and a line extending due west from the Mexican border.

(3) In waters less than 35 fathoms between a line running 180 degrees true from Point Fermin
 and a line running 270 degrees true from the south jetty of Newport Harbor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.3.

(a) From January 1, 1991, to December 31, 1993, inclusive, gill nets or trammel nets may only be used in the zone pursuant to a nontransferable permit issued by the department pursuant to Section 8610.5.

(b) On and after January 1, 1994, gill nets and trammel nets shall not be used in the zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, gill nets and trammel nets may not be used to take any species of rockfish.

(b) In ocean waters north of Point Arguello on and after November 7, 1990, the use of gill nets and trammel nets shall be regulated by Article 4 (commencing with Section 8660), Article 5 (commencing with Section 8680) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 8720) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 6, or any regulation or order issued pursuant to these
 articles, in effect on January 1, 1990, except that as to Sections 8680, 8681, 8681.7, and 8682, and subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 8681.5, or any regulation or order issued pursuant to these sections, the provisions in effect on January 1, 1989, shall control where not in conflict with other provisions of this article, and shall be applicable to all ocean waters. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Legislature shall not be precluded from imposing more restrictions on the use or possession of gill nets or trammel nets. The director shall not authorize the use of gill nets or trammel nets in any area where the use is not permitted even if the director makes specified findings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.5.

The department shall issue a permit to use a gill net or trammel net in the zone for the period specified in subdivision (a) of Section 8610.3 to any applicant who meets both of the following requirements:

(a) Has a commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Sections 7850 to 7852.3, inclusive.

(b) Has a permit issued pursuant to Section 8681 and is presently the owner or operator of a vessel equipped with a gill net or trammel
 net.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.6.

The department shall charge the following fees for permits issued pursuant to Section 8610.5 pursuant to the following schedule:Calendar YearFee1991$ 2501992 5001993 1,000

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.11.

It is unlawful for any person to take, possess, receive, transport, purchase, sell, barter, or process any fish obtained in violation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.12.

To increase the state’s scientific and biological information on the ocean fisheries of this state, the department shall establish a program whereby it can monitor and evaluate the daily landings of fish by commercial fishermen who are permitted under this article to take these fish. The cost of implementing this monitoring program shall be borne by the commercial fishing industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.13.

The penalty for a violation of Section 8610.3 or 8610.4 is as specified in Section 12003.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 263, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.14.

(a) Prior to January 1, 1994, the commission shall establish four new ecological reserves in ocean waters along the mainland coast. Each ecological reserve shall have a surface area of at least two square miles. The commission shall restrict the use of these ecological reserves to scientific research relating to the management and enhancement of marine resources, including, but not limited to, scientific research as it relates to sportfishing and commercial fishing.

Recreational uses, including, but
 not limited to, hiking, walking, viewing, swimming, diving, surfing, and transient boating are not in conflict with this section.

(b) Prior to establishing the four ecological reserves, the commission shall conduct a public hearing at each of the recommended sites or at the nearest practicable location.

(c) On and after January 1, 2002, the four ecological reserves established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be called state marine reserves, unless otherwise reclassified pursuant to Section 2855, and shall become part of the state system of marine managed areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.15.

This article does not preempt or supersede any other closures to protect any other wildlife, including sea otters, whales, and shorebirds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.16.

If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Nets for Particular Varieties of Fish [8623. - 8626.]

8623.

(a) It is unlawful to use any purse seine or round haul net to take yellowtail, barracuda, or white sea bass.

(b) It is unlawful to possess any yellowtail, barracuda, or white sea bass, except those taken south of the international boundary between the United States and Mexico, and imported into the state under regulations of the commission as provided in Section 2362, on any boat carrying or using any purse seine or round haul net, including, but not limited to, a bait net as described in Section 8780.

(c) Gill nets with meshes of a minimum length of 312 inches
 may be used to take yellowtail and barracuda.

(d) Gill nets with meshes of a minimum length of six inches may be used to take white sea bass; however, during the period from June 16 to March 14, inclusive, not more than 20 percent by number of a load of fish may be white seabass 28 inches or more in total length, up to a maximum of 10 white seabass per load, if taken in gill nets or trammel nets with meshes from 312 to 6 inches in length.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the department may issue permits to hook and line commercial fishermen to possess a bona fide bait net on their vessels for the purpose of taking bait for their own use only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 165.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8625.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this code, set gill nets and trammel nets with mesh size of not less than 812 inches may be used to take California halibut.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), not more than 1,500 fathoms (9,000 feet) of gill net or trammel net shall be fished in combination each day for California halibut from any vessel in ocean waters.

(c) Not more than 1,000 fathoms (6,000 feet) of gill net or trammel net shall be fished in combination each day for California halibut from any vessel in ocean waters between a line extending due west
 magnetic from Point Arguello in Santa Barbara County and a line extending 172° magnetic from Rincon Point in Santa Barbara County to San Pedro Point at the east end of Santa Cruz Island in Santa Barbara County, then extending southwesterly 188° magnetic from San Pedro Point on Santa Cruz Island.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 166.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8626.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 8625, and where consistent with the determination made pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), the director may reduce the minimum mesh size permitted for gill and trammel nets used to take California halibut from 812 inches to not less than 8 inches in any or all areas south of a line extending 240° magnetic from the boundary line between the Counties of Los Angeles and Ventura.

(b) If, on or before October 1, 1990, the department determines that commercial landings of California halibut taken south of the line extending 240° magnetic from the boundary line between the Counties of Los Angeles and
 Ventura in the period between September 1, 1989, and August 31, 1990, decline by 10 percent or more compared with landings of California halibut taken in this area during the period between September 1, 1988, and August 31, 1989, the department shall assess the impact of the 812 inch minimum mesh size restriction on the California halibut fishery in the area described in subdivision (a). The assessment shall include, but is not limited to, an analysis of landing data, including landings of California halibut in Los Angeles, Orange, and San Diego Counties, the age and size composition of the catch, and the department’s monitoring at sea of the gill and trammel net fishery.

(c) If the department determines that the 812 inch minimum mesh size,
 established pursuant to Section 8625 has directly resulted in a decline of 10 percent or more in landings of California halibut south of the line extending 240° magnetic from the boundary between the Counties of Los Angeles and Ventura, the director shall hold a public hearing in the area affected to make findings and take public testimony prior to taking any action pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 167.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Seizure [8630. - 8635.]

8630.

Any net or trap used for taking fish in violation of the provisions of this code is a public nuisance. It is the duty of every person authorized to make an arrest for such a violation to seize and keep the net and report the seizure to the department.

The department may commence proceedings in the superior court of the county or city and county in which the seizure is made by petitioning the court for a judgment forfeiting the net. Upon the filing of the petition, the clerk of the court shall fix a time for a hearing and cause notices to be posted for 14 days in at least three public places in the place where the court is held, setting forth the substance of the petition and the time and place fixed for its hearing. At that time, the court shall hear and determine the proceeding and, upon proof that the net was used in violation of this code shall order it forfeited. Any net so forfeited shall be sold or destroyed by the department. The proceeds from all those sales shall be paid into the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1442, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

8631.

In lieu of a physical seizure pursuant to this article, any person authorized to make an arrest for a violation of any provision of this code, may attach to any net used for taking fish in violation of this code a tag of metal or other material, which shall be adopted by the department for this purpose and furnished to such person. The tag shall be impressed or printed with language stating that the net to which it is attached is thereby seized by the department as a public nuisance. The act of attaching such tag shall be a seizure within the meaning of this section.

Removal of a tag attached to any net pursuant to this section by any person other than a person authorized by the department, or the use of any such net by any person for fishing purposes, unless authorized by the department or by the superior court, is a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8632.

Within three days after the department has been notified in writing that a vessel carrying a seized net has arrived in port, the department may remove the net from the vessel, unless the owner has furnished a bond in accordance with Section 8633. The notice shall be sufficient when delivered to the office of the department nearest to the port at which the vessel has arrived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 127.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8633.

When any net is seized pursuant to this article, the owner or any other person otherwise entitled to possession of the net may apply to the superior court of the county or city and county in which the seizure was made, or the county or city and county of which the claimant is a resident, for leave to file a bond and regain possession of the net during the pendency of the proceedings. The bond shall be in an amount determined by the judge to be the actual value of the net at the time of its release. It shall be filed within three days after the seizure of the net, and shall be conditioned upon the return of the net to the custody of the department in the event the net is ordered forfeited. Upon filing the bond, the person on whose behalf it is given shall be put in possession of the net and may use the net until it is finally ordered delivered up and forfeited, if such be the judgment of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

8634.

When any net is seized pursuant to this article and the owner or any other person otherwise entitled to possession of the net has filed a bond and regained possession of the net, the person in possession of the net, when in the judgment of the court the net is ordered forfeited, shall deliver the net to the department by removing the net from the boat and placing in a warehouse or storage designated by the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8635.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 8633, any net or trap seized pursuant to Section 8630 as illegal because of its size, manner of construction, materials used in its construction, or configuration of its parts is presumed to be contraband and shall not be returned pending forfeiture unless it can be and is modified to eliminate the condition of illegality. This subdivision does not apply to any net or trap seized pursuant to Section 8630 for illegal use.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any net or trap seized pursuant to Section 8630 that is needed for evidence may be held for evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1048, Sec. 8.   Effective September 26, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Nets Generally in Particular Districts [8660. - 8670.]

8660.

Nothing in this chapter authorizing the use of nets in District 19 or 19A shall authorize the use of any net within 750 feet of any pier, wharf, jetty, or breakwater, except that dip nets may be used subject to the provisions of Section 8870.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 617.)
-------------------------------------------

8661.

Vessels may carry nets across Districts 19A and 20 to open water outside those districts. Vessels carrying nets may enter harbors in Districts 19A and 20 only in cases of distress or emergency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8663.

No gill net, trammel net, or fyke net may be possessed on any boat in the waters of any district lying upstream from a line drawn between Antioch Point and the westerly tip of Kimball Island and from a line drawn from Point Sacramento across the stream and touching the most easterly point on Montezuma Island.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8664.

Except in Districts 6 and 7, any net found in, or within 500 feet of the Klamath, Smith, Eel, Mad, Van Dusen, or Mattole Rivers, or their tributaries, is prima facie evidence that the owner or person in possession of the net is or has been using it unlawfully.

The provisions of this section do not apply to trawl or drag nets being transported.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8664.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 8693 and 8724, gill nets and trammel nets shall not be used in those portions of District 17 between a line extending 220° magnetic from the mouth of Waddell Creek in Santa Cruz County and a line extending 252° magnetic from Yankee Point, Carmel Highlands, in Monterey County in waters 30 fathoms or less in depth at mean lower low water.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 8693 and 8724, gill nets and trammel nets shall not be used in that portion of
 District 18 north of a line extending due west from Point Sal in Santa Barbara County in waters 30 fathoms or less in depth at mean lower low water.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 8693 and 8724, any person using gill nets or trammel nets in those portions of Districts 17 and 18 from a line extending 220° magnetic from the mouth of Waddell Creek in Santa Cruz County to a line extending due west from Point Sal in Santa Barbara County in waters between 30 fathoms and 40 fathoms in depth at mean lower low water shall comply with all of the following requirements in order to ensure adequate monitoring of fishing effort to protect marine mammals:

(1) Prior to the use, the person shall notify the department that gill nets or trammel nets will be set in the area.

(2) The person shall give adequate notification, as determined
 by the department, to the department at its office in Monterey or Morro Bay at least 24 hours prior to each fishing trip to ensure full compliance and cooperation with the monitoring program. The department may require that an authorized monitor be on board the vessel. The department shall determine whether on board, at sea, or shoreside monitoring is appropriate. If the authorized monitor is not on board the fishing vessel, the fishing vessel operator and the authorized monitor shall make every effort to remain in radio contact if the radio equipment is made available to the monitor.

(3) To ensure the effectiveness of the monitoring program, gill nets and trammel nets may be set or pulled only between one-half hour after sunrise and one-half hour before sunset.

(4) A permit may be revoked and canceled pursuant to Section 8681 for failure to comply with the department’s
 notification and monitoring requirements.

(d) If the director determines that the use of gill or trammel nets is having an adverse impact on any population of any species of seabird, marine mammal, or fish, the director shall issue an order prohibiting or restricting the use, method of use, size, or materials used in the construction of either or both types of those nets in all or any part of District 10 or 17, or in all or any part of District 18 north of a line extending due west from Point Conception in Santa Barbara County for a specified period. The order shall take effect no later than 48 hours after its issuance. The director shall hold a properly noticed public hearing in a place convenient to the affected area within one week of the effective date of the order to describe the action taken and shall take testimony as to the effect of the order and determine whether any modification of the order is necessary.

(e) For purposes of this section, “adverse impact” means either of the following:

(1) The danger of irreparable injury to, or mortality in, any population of any species of seabird, marine mammal, or fish which is occurring at a rate that threatens the viability of the population as a direct result of the use of gill nets or trammel nets.

(2) The impairment of the recovery of a species listed as an endangered species or threatened species pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) or the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3) or a species of seabird, marine mammal, or fish designated as fully protected under this code, as a direct result of the use of gill nets or trammel nets.

(f) This section does not apply to any gill net with meshes 312 inches or less in length in any portion of District 18 between Yankee Point in Monterey County and Point Sal in Santa Barbara County.

(g) The Legislature finds and declares that this section, as amended by Chapter 884 of the Statutes of 1990, and as amended by the act that amended this section during the 1992 portion of the 1991–92 Regular Session, is more restrictive on the use and possession of gill nets and trammel nets than the version of this section in effect on January 1, 1990, and therefore complies with Section 8610.4, and Section 4 of Article XB of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8664.67.

“Impacted fisherman” for purposes of Sections 8664.5 and 8664.65, means any person who, from January 1, 1986, to December 31, 1990, inclusive, landed a minimum of 1,000 pounds of fish, other than shark or rockfish, in each of at least three calendar years during that period with set gill and trammel nets and landed the fish at ports within areas subject to gill and trammel net closures pursuant to Section 8664.5. Landings shall be verified by the fisherman’s submittal of landing receipts as provided in Section 8043.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1370, Sec. 31.   Effective October 27, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

8664.7.

The initial period of effectiveness of an order issued pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 8664.5 shall not exceed 120 days. After a further public hearing, the director may, on the basis of a report prepared by the department on the condition of the local population of any species of seabird, marine mammal, or fish, extend the order for a further specified period or reissue the order for a further specified period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 50, Sec. 3.   Effective May 24, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

8664.8.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 8685, 8687, 8696, and 8724, and except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), set or drift gill or trammel nets shall not be used in ocean waters between a line extending 245° magnetic from the most westerly point of the west point of the Point Reyes headlands in Marin County and the westerly extension of the California-Oregon boundary.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 8664.5, 8687, 8696, and 8724, set or drift gill or trammel
 nets shall not be used in waters which are 40 fathoms or less in depth at mean lower low water between a line extending 245° magnetic from the most westerly point of the west point of the Point Reyes headlands in Marin County and a line extending 225° magnetic from Pillar Point at Half Moon Bay in San Mateo County.

(2) Notwithstanding Sections 8664.5, 8687, 8696, and 8724, set or drift gill or trammel nets shall not be used in ocean waters which are 60 fathoms or less in depth at mean lower low water between a line extending 225° magnetic from Pillar Point at Half Moon Bay in San Mateo County to a line extending 220° magnetic from the mouth of Waddell Creek in Santa Cruz County.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to the use of drift gill nets operated under a permit issued by the department in that part of Arcata Bay in Humboldt County lying northeast of the Samoa Bridge
 during the period from April 1 to September 30, inclusive. The department may issue not more than six permits pursuant to this subdivision. Each permit shall specify the amount and type of gear which may be used under the permit.

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) do not apply to the use of set gill nets used pursuant to Article 15 (commencing with Section 8550) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 6 or regulations adopted under that article or to the use of drift gill nets with a mesh size of 14 inches or more.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) and Sections 8687, 8696, and 8724, gill or trammel nets shall not be used within three nautical miles of the Farallon Islands in San Francisco County, and within three nautical miles of Noonday Rock buoy located approximately
 312 miles 276° magnetic from North Farallon Island.

(2) If the director determines that the use of set or drift gill or trammel nets is having an adverse impact on any population of any species of sea bird, marine mammal, or fish, the director shall issue an order prohibiting the use of those nets between three nautical miles and five nautical miles of the Farallon Islands and Noonday Rock buoy or any portion of that area. The order shall take effect not later than 48 hours after its issuance. The director shall hold a properly noticed public hearing in a place convenient to the affected area within one week of the effective date of the order to describe the action taken and shall take testimony as to the effect of the order and determine whether any modification of the order is necessary. Gill and trammel nets used to take fish in District 10
 shall be marked at each end with a buoy displaying above its waterline in Arabic numerals at least two inches high, the fisherman’s identification number issued by the department under Section 7852. Nets shall be marked at both ends and at least every 250 fathoms between the ends with flags of the same color and at least 144 square inches in size, acceptable to the department.

(f) The Legislature finds and declares that this section, as amended by Chapter 1633 of the Statutes of 1990, is more restrictive on the use and possession of gill nets and trammel nets than the version of this section in effect on January 1, 1990, and therefore complies with Section 8610.4, and Section 4 of Article XB of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8664.13.

During the period from December 15 to May 15, inclusive, set gill nets and trammel nets with mesh eight inches or greater and less than 12 inches used in ocean waters 25 fathoms or less in depth between a line extending due west magnetic from Point Conception and the westerly extension of the boundary line between the Republic of Mexico and the United States shall be constructed with breakaway and anchoring features, as follows:

(a) The corkline and any other line which may extend across the top of the net shall have a combined breaking strength not to exceed 2,400
 pounds.

(b) A breakaway device shall be used along the corkline (headrope) and along the leadline (footrope) at regular intervals of 45 fathoms or less.

(c) Each breakaway or disconnect device shall be constructed as described in either of the following:

(1) Of nylon twine, or an equivalent material, with a breaking strength of 200 pounds or less, using not more than eight complete circular (360) wraps of the twine to connect the ends of each corkline and leadline interval, which allows each breakaway or disconnect device a breaking strength of not more than 1,600 pounds.

(2) As the department may otherwise authorize.

(d) Anchors used to secure each end of the net to the ocean bottom shall
 weigh not less than 35 pounds each, and shall be attached to the net by a ground rope and bridle with combined length of not less than 15 fathoms from the anchor to the net.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 979, Sec. 2.   Effective September 23, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

8665.

In District 118.5, nets may not be used within 750 feet of any pier or dock, except for bait nets described in Section 8780 used to capture live bait and lobster traps authorized for use pursuant to Section 9010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------
